Washington statutes.
RCW 19.40.905

Effect on prior transfers and obligations—2017 c 57.

(1) Chapter 57, Laws of 2017 applies to a transfer made or obligation incurred on or after July 23, 2017.

(2) Chapter 57, Laws of 2017 does not apply to a transfer made or obligation incurred before July 23, 2017.

(3) Chapter 57, Laws of 2017 does not apply to a right of action that has accrued before July 23, 2017.

(4) For the purposes of this section, a transfer is made and an obligation is incurred at the time provided in RCW 19.40.061.

[ 2017 c 57 s 14.]